Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1,135.04
Rules and regulations; guidance documents and internal procedural documents; availability; notice; contents.

Rules and regulations may authorize the Director of Correctional Services to issue guidance documents and internal procedural documents not inconsistent with law and rules and regulations. Such guidance documents and internal procedural documents shall be made available to the public at one public location and on the department’s website unless the safety and security of a correctional institution would be placed at imminent and substantial risk by such publication. If any guidance document or internal procedural document is not made available to the public, notice shall be given to the deputy public counsel for corrections and to the Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System. The notice shall identify all documents not publicly available by title, number of pages, and date adopted. All guidance documents and internal procedural documents shall be made available to any member of the Legislature upon request. Security manuals shall be made available to the Legislature for inspection upon request, but shall not be copied or removed from secure locations as designated by the director.

Laws 2016, LB867, § 17.